Maine, session 132, LD249.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3024, first ¶, as amended by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. EEE, §1, is
further amended to read:
The salary of the Chief Medical Examiner of the State must be set by the Governor.
Other nonsalaried medical examiners and nonsalaried medicolegal death investigators,
upon the submission of their completed report to the Chief Medical Examiner, must be paid
a fee of up to $100 $150 for an inspection and view and are entitled to receive travel
expenses to be calculated at the mileage rate currently paid to state employees pursuant to
Title 5, section 8. An additional fee of $50 may be authorized by the Chief Medical
Examiner for payment to other nonsalaried medical examiners and nonsalaried medicolegal
death investigators for visits to death scenes other than hospitals.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3024, 4th ¶, as amended by PL 2011, c. 445, §1 and affected
by §3, is further amended to read:
The Chief Medical Examiner may authorize any other expenses necessary to carry out
the Chief Medical Examiner's duties. The Chief Medical Examiner shall reimburse a
funeral establishment that transports a body to Augusta at the request of the Office of Chief
Medical Examiner at the following rates: for up to and including the first 25 miles, $120;
for the next 25 miles, $2 per mile traveled while actually transporting a body; and for miles
in excess of 50, $1.75 per mile traveled while actually transporting a body.